Maryland, session 2025, HB0180.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
11–1102.
(a) There is a Victim Services Unit in the Governor’s Office of Crime Prevention
and Policy.
(b) The Unit consists of:
(1) the Criminal Injuries Compensation Board under Subtitle 8 of this title;
(2) the program for sexual assault forensic examinations under § 11–1007
of this title;
(3) THE GUN VIOLENCE VICTIM RELOCATION PROGRAM UNDER
TITLE 5, SUBTITLE 9 OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE;
[(3)] (4) a restitution section; and
[(4)] (5) any other program that provides victim services under the
Governor’s Office of Crime Prevention and Policy that the Executive Director determines
would benefit from inclusion under the Unit.
Article – Public Safety
SUBTITLE 9. GUN VIOLENCE VICTIM RELOCATION PROGRAM.
5–901.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.

HOUSE BILL 180 3
(B) “FUND” MEANS THE GUN VIOLENCE VICTIM RELOCATION PROGRAM
FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 5–906 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE GUN VIOLENCE VICTIM RELOCATION
PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER § 5–902 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(D) “VICTIM SERVICES UNIT” MEANS THE VICTIM SERVICES UNIT WITHIN
THE GOVERNOR’S OFFICE OF CRIME PREVENTION AND POLICY ESTABLISHED
UNDER § 11–1102 OF THE CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE.
5–902.
(A) THERE IS A GUN VIOLENCE VICTIM RELOCATION PROGRAM WITHIN
THE VICTIM SERVICES UNIT.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO ASSIST IN THE RELOCATION OF
VICTIMS OF GUN VIOLENCE IN THE STATE TO ENSURE THE SAFETY AND WELL–BEING
OF THE VICTIM AND THE VICTIM’S FAMILY.
(C) THIS SUBTITLE SHALL BE LIBERALLY CONSTRUED AND APPLIED TO
PROMOTE ITS UNDERLYING PURPOSE.
5–903.
(A) (1) AN INDIVIDUAL MAY REQUEST PARTICIPATION IN THE PROGRAM
THROUGH THE VICTIM SERVICES UNIT.
(2) AN INDIVIDUAL IS ELIGIBLE FOR ASSISTANCE THROUGH THE
PROGRAM IF:
(I) THE INDIVIDUAL IS A VICTIM OF GUN VIOLENCE IN THE
STATE;
(II) 1. THE INDIVIDUAL EXPERIENCED THE VIOLENCE
WITHIN CLOSE PROXIMITY TO THE INDIVIDUAL’S HOME; OR
2. THE INDIVIDUAL LIVES IN CLOSE PROXIMITY TO A
PERSON WHO IS SUSPECTED TO HAVE CAUSED THE VIOLENCE; AND
(III) THE INDIVIDUAL DEMONSTRATES A NEED TO BE
RELOCATED FOR THE SAFETY OF THE INDIVIDUAL OR THE INDIVIDUAL’S FAMILY.

HOUSE BILL 180
(3) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, THE VICTIM SERVICES UNIT SHALL ACCEPT ANY ELIGIBLE
INDIVIDUAL INTO THE PROGRAM.
(II) THE VICTIM SERVICES UNIT MAY NOT ACCEPT AN
INDIVIDUAL INTO THE PROGRAM IF THE INDIVIDUAL IS SUSPECTED TO HAVE
PERPETRATED THE VIOLENCE.
(B) THE VICTIM SERVICES UNIT SHALL KEEP THE PERSONAL
INFORMATION OF AN INDIVIDUAL WHO APPLIES FOR THE PROGRAM UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION CONFIDENTIAL, INCLUDING THE ADDRESS AND
ANY OTHER IDENTIFYING INFORMATION OF THE INDIVIDUAL.
5–904.
(A) THE VICTIM SERVICES UNIT SHALL ASSIST AN ELIGIBLE VICTIM
ACCEPTED INTO THE PROGRAM BY:
(1) RELOCATING THE VICTIM AND THE VICTIM’S FAMILY TO A SAFE
LOCATION;
(2) PROVIDING THE VICTIM WITH FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE FOR
MOVING EXPENSES, SECURITY DEPOSIT, AND RENT; AND
(3) PROVIDING OTHER SUPPORT SERVICES, INCLUDING
COUNSELING, LEGAL ASSISTANCE, JOB TRAINING, AND RESOURCES AND SERVICES
FOR INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES.
(B) THE VICTIM SERVICES UNIT SHALL:
(1) COLLABORATE WITH OTHER STATE AND LOCAL AGENCIES,
INCLUDING LAW ENFORCEMENT, HOUSING AUTHORITIES, AND SOCIAL SERVICES, TO
PROVIDE COMPREHENSIVE SERVICES TO VICTIMS UNDER THE PROGRAM;
(2) CONDUCT COMMUNITY OUTREACH IN ORDER TO EDUCATE THE
PUBLIC ABOUT THE PROGRAM AND TO ENCOURAGE VICTIMS OF GUN VIOLENCE TO
SEEK ASSISTANCE UNDER THE PROGRAM; AND
(3) WORK TO ENSURE THAT VICTIMS UNDER THE PROGRAM WHO ARE
RENTERS ARE PROTECTED FROM EVICTION OR FROM BEING DENIED RENTAL
HOUSING BASED ON THE VICTIM’S STATUS IN THE PROGRAM.
(C) THE VICTIM SERVICES UNIT SHALL ADOPT RULES AND REGULATIONS

HOUSE BILL 180 5
NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE.
5–905.
THE VICTIM SERVICES UNIT SHALL ESTABLISH AN APPEAL PROCESS FOR AN
INDIVIDUAL DETERMINED TO BE INELIGIBLE AND DENIED ASSISTANCE UNDER THE
PROGRAM.
5–906.
(A) THERE IS A GUN VIOLENCE VICTIM RELOCATION PROGRAM FUND.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO CARRY OUT THE PROVISIONS OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(C) THE VICTIM SERVICES UNIT SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(D) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(E) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND;
(2) PRIVATE DONATIONS; AND
(3) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(F) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY FOR CARRYING OUT THE PURPOSE OF
THE FUND.
(G) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO
THE FUND.
(H) NO PART OF THE FUND MAY REVERT OR BE CREDITED TO:

HOUSE BILL 180
(1) THE GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE; OR
(2) ANY OTHER SPECIAL FUND OF THE STATE.
(I) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(J) THE FUND IS SUBJECT TO AUDIT BY THE OFFICE OF LEGISLATIVE
AUDITS AS PROVIDED IN § 2–1220 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
5–907.
(A) THE VICTIM SERVICES UNIT SHALL ESTABLISH AN OVERSIGHT
COMMISSION TO ENSURE THAT THE PROGRAM IS BEING ADMINISTERED PROPERLY
AND THAT THE FUND IS BEING USED APPROPRIATELY.
(B) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2027, THE
VICTIM SERVICES UNIT SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT ON THE STATUS OF THE PROGRAM
TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY THAT INCLUDES:
(1) THE NUMBER OF INDIVIDUALS ACCEPTED INTO THE PROGRAM;
(2) THE NUMBER OF INDIVIDUALS WHO APPLIED FOR THE PROGRAM;
(3) THE TYPES OF SERVICES PROVIDED TO THE VICTIMS UNDER THE
PROGRAM;
(4) AN OUTLINE OF HOW THE FUND IS USED TO SUPPORT THE
PROGRAM;
(5) AN EVALUATION OF THE PROGRAM; AND
(6) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THAT MAY BE USEFUL IN
DETERMINING THE PROGRAM’S EFFECTIVENESS.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (2) (i) 1. This subparagraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024
through 2028.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless

HOUSE BILL 180 7
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(ii) The provisions of subparagraph (i) of this paragraph do not apply
to the following funds:
204. the Victims of Domestic Violence Program Grant Fund;
[and]
205. the Proposed Programs Collaborative Grant Fund; AND
206. THE GUN VIOLENCE VICTIM RELOCATION PROGRAM
FUND.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, for fiscal year 2027, the
Governor shall include in the annual budget bill an appropriation of $10,000,000 to the Gun
Violence Victim Relocation Program Fund established under Title 5, Subtitle 9 of the Public
Safety Article.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.